Illinois, session 104th, HB5115.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $5,200,000, or so much of that sum as 5may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 7for grants to the Cook County to be used as supplemental 8funding for the Build Up Cook program. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.